test/src/morphology/N-duntsh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - duņtš: # Noun 70 'eng /est pussnuga/fin' - full paradigm
     duņtš+N+Sg+Nom: duņtš
     duņtš+N+Sg+Gen: duņtš
     duņtš+N+Sg+Par: duņtšõ
     duņtš+N+Sg+Dat: duņtšõn
     duņtš+N+Sg+Ins: duņtšõks
     duņtš+N+Sg+Ill: duņtšõ
     duņtš+N+Sg+Ela: duņtšõst
     duņtš+N+Pl+Nom: dūņtšid
     duņtš+N+Pl+Gen: dūņtšid
     duņtš+N+Pl+Par: dūņtšidi
     duņtš+N+Pl+Dat: dūņtšidõn
     duņtš+N+Pl+Ins: dūņtšidõks
     duņtš+N+Pl+Ill: dūņtšiz
     duņtš+N+Pl+Ela: dūņtšist
